Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB894.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of June 2, 1915 (P.L.736, No.338), known as the Workers' Compensation Act, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 304.3. (a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this act , a person may file a registration with the department regarding the status of an individual who is classified for Federal income tax purposes as an independent contractor of the person.(b) A registration under this section shall include the following:(1) A written waiver by the individual of all benefits under 123456789101112131415161718192021 this act from the person.(2) An affidavit by the individual specifying that the individual understands and agrees that the individual: (i) is not an employe of the person;(ii) is not entitled to benefits under this act from the person;(iii) may purchase workers' compensation insurance under this act or other disability insurance at the individual's own expense; and(iv) is not entitled to benefits from the Uninsured Employers Guaranty Fund if the individual is injured while performing services for the person.(c) The waiver and affidavit under subsection (b) shall be made upon forms prescribed by the department.(d) (1) A person who registers an individual as an independent contractor under this section:(i) shall not be liable to the individual for benefits under this act; and(ii) shall not be required to provide insurance coverage or self-insure under this act regarding the individual.(2) An individual registered as an independent contractor under this section shall not be eligible for benefits from the Uninsured Employers Guaranty Fund if the person is injured while performing services as an independent contractor pursuant to the registration.(e) A registration identifying an individual as an independent contractor shall be valid for each future year, except that the individual may request that the registration be revoked at any time. The following apply:(1) The request for revocation shall be on a form prescribed 20250SB0894PN1005 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 by the department.(2) The individual shall file the request for revocation with the department and concurrently provide notice by certified mail of the filing of the request with the person who filed the registration.(3) The department shall confirm receipt of the request for revocation with the individual and the person within five days of the receipt of the request . (4) The revocation shall be effective ten days after the receipt of the request by the department.(f) A person shall not do any of the following to persuade an individual to complete the waiver and affidavit under subsection (b) or refrain from filing a request for revocation under subsection (e):(1) Knowingly provide an incentive to the individual, pecuniary or otherwise.(2) Knowingly provide materially false information to the individual.(3) Knowingly withhold information from the individual in order to deceive the individual.(g) A person violating subsection (f) shall be subject to the penalties for an intentional violation of section 305. (h) As used in this section:(1) "Independent contractor" includes an individual who performs services for a person for valuable consideration but who is not classified as an employe of the person for Federal income tax purposes.(2) "Person" includes a corporation, partnership, limited liability company, business trust, other association, government entity other than the Commonwealth, estate, trust, foundation or 20250SB0894PN1005 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 individual.Section 2. The addition of section 304.3 of the act shall not be construed to alter, repeal or supersede any provision of the act of October 13, 2010 (P.L.506, No.72), known as the Construction Workplace Misclassification Act.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 180 days.20250SB0894PN1005 - 4 - 123456